New York, session 2025-2026, A9364.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "regional 2 equity in policy implementation act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings and intent. The Legislature finds that New 4 York State's diverse regions including the North Country, Capital 5 Region, Mohawk Valley, Central New York, Southern Tier, Western New 6 York, the Hudson Valley, New York City, and Long Island face signif- 7 icantly different economic capacities, infrastructure realities, and 8 readiness levels for transition to the green economy. 9 While certain regions of the state possess robust and modernized elec- 10 trical grids and transportation infrastructure, other areas particularly 11 rural and upstate regions--experience aging or unreliable utility 12 systems, reduced tax bases, unique geographic constraints, and 13 disproportionate implementation costs. 14 Statewide mandates and programs often assume uniform readiness and 15 capacity across all regions, unintentionally creating inequitable 16 burdens and slowing progress toward statewide climate and sustainability 17 goals. 18 Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that state- 19 wide policies recognize these regional differences by establishing a 20 standardized 10-point regional impact test to evaluate the feasibility, 21 cost, and equity implications of proposed laws, regulations, and capital 22 programs. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14186-01-5 A. 9364 2 1 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 184 to read 2 as follows: 3 § 184. Regional impact assessment framework. 1. For the purposes of 4 this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "policy" shall mean any statewide legislation, regulatory action, 6 program design, or funding mandate involving climate, energy, infras- 7 tructure, economic development, or municipal obligations. 8 (b) "test" shall mean the ten-point regional impact test developed 9 under this section. 10 2. The division of the budget, in consultation with the department of 11 public service, the department of environmental conservation, the New 12 York state energy research and development authority, and the empire 13 state development corporation, shall: 14 (a) develop and maintain a regional impact assessment framework appli- 15 cable to statewide policies; and 16 (b) define no less than ten regions of the state. 17 3. Any policy proposed within the state shall be accompanied by: 18 (a) a ten-point regional impact test, unless expressly exempted by 19 law; and 20 (b) a publicly available report based on the ten-point regional impact 21 test which shall include, but not be limited to: 22 (i) regional disparities identified and taken into account; 23 (ii) strategies which support regions with lower capacity or read- 24 iness; 25 (iii) demonstrations that regions are not disproportionately burdened 26 in cost, compliance, or infrastructure requirements; 27 (iv) any data supporting the regional impact test's results; and 28 (v) detailed information on proposed mitigation strategies. 29 4. (a) The ten-point regional impact test shall include ten criteria 30 which shall be evaluated and scored for each region within the state. 31 Such criteria shall be: 32 (i) infrastructure readiness, including but not limited to reliability 33 of the electrical grid, broadband, transportation systems, and 34 water/wastewater capacity. 35 (ii) economic capacity, including but not limited to ability of house- 36 holds, municipalities, and businesses to absorb compliance or upgrade 37 costs. 38 (iii) workforce availability and skills, including but not limited to 39 availability of trained workers needed to implement the policy or wheth- 40 er additional workforce development is required. 41 (iv) technological readiness, including but not limited to availabili- 42 ty of clean-energy systems, electric vehicle infrastructure, heat pumps, 43 transmission capacity, and related technologies. 44 (v) geographic and climatic conditions, including but not limited to 45 unique challenges related to climate, weather severity, rural distances, 46 or terrain. 47 (vi) community and demographic needs, including but not limited to 48 impacts on low-income communities, aging populations, and areas with 49 limited transportation access. 50 (vii) municipal capacity, including but not limited to availability of 51 local planning staff, code enforcement, grant-writing capacity, and 52 regional administrative support. 53 (viii) cost-benefit distribution, including but not limited to whether 54 benefits and burdens are proportionally shared between regions. A. 9364 3 1 (ix) implementation timeline feasibility, including but not limited to 2 whether the proposed timeline is practical given a region's infrastruc- 3 ture and economic realities. 4 (x) equity and resiliency outcomes, including but not limited to 5 assessment of whether the policy increases resiliency and avoids 6 disproportionate impacts on any region. 7 (b) Each region shall receive a rating of "high impact," "moderate 8 impact," or "low/no impact" based on the findings of the test. Where 9 three or more regions score "high impact," the policy shall be revised 10 or include mitigation measures. 11 5. Mitigation measures shall be tailored to the region and the crite- 12 ria resulting in the "high impact" rating and shall not include the 13 policy being implemented in a manner that disproportionately harms or 14 delays progress in regions with lower infrastructure readiness. 15 6. The division of the budget shall submit an annual report to the 16 legislature and the governor summarizing statewide trends, regional 17 needs, and recommended updates to this section. 18 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 19 statewide legislation, regulatory actions, program designs, or funding 20 mandates chaptered or adopted on and after January 1, 2027.